Utah statutes.
58-37d-9.   Department of Public Safety enforcement authority.
(1)  As used in this section, "division" means the Criminal Investigations and
Technical Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, created in
Section 53-10-103.
(2)  The division has authority to enforce this chapter.  To carry out this
purpose, the division may:
(a)  assist the law enforcement agencies of the state in enforcing this
chapter;
(b)  conduct investigations to enforce this chapter;
(c)  present evidence obtained from investigations conducted in conjunction
with appropriate county and district attorneys and the Office of the Attorney
General for civil or criminal prosecution or for administrative action against
a licensee; and
(d)  work in cooperation with the Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing, created under Section 58-1-103, to accomplish the purposes of this
section.
